Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.43.964 and 2003 c 405 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:The Washington state patrol in consultation with the office of financial management and the Washington military department shall develop procedures to facilitate reimbursement to state agencies and jurisdictions from appropriate federal and state funds when state agencies and jurisdictions are mobilized by the chief under the Washington state fire services mobilization plan. ((The))Utilizing existing resources, the Washington state patrol shall ensure that these procedures provide reimbursement to the host district ((in as timely a manner as possible))and to mobilized state agencies and jurisdictions within 60 days of receipt by the Washington state patrol of complete and accurate reimbursement documentation, as required by the Washington state fire services mobilization plan.--- END ---